Georgia, session 2025_26, SB312.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 7 of Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the Department
of Economic Development, is amended by adding a new article to read as follows:
S. B. 312
- 1 -

LC 62 0138
"ARTICLE 11
50-7-130.
(a)(1) As used in this article, the term 'advisory council' means the Georgia Peach Walk
of Fame Advisory Council.
(2) There is hereby established the Georgia Peach Walk of Fame Advisory Council
within the department.
(b)(1) The advisory council shall be composed of 15 members, to be appointed by the
Governor, who shall be representative of professional and lay individuals, organizations,
and governmental agencies associated with the entertainment industry in this state.
(2) The advisory council shall elect a chairperson, vice chairperson, treasurer, and
secretary. The treasurer and secretary can be the same member.
(c) The members shall serve for two-year terms. Of the members first appointed, seven
shall be appointed for terms of one year and eight shall be appointed for terms of two years.
Vacancies shall be filled by similar appointment for unexpired terms.
(d) All members of the advisory council shall be full-time residents of Georgia.
(e) The advisory council shall meet upon the call of the chairperson and shall meet no less
than quarterly, either in person or via virtual means. The advisory council shall provide
opportunities for the public to provide input.
(f) Members of the advisory council shall receive no compensation for their services, but
shall be allowed actual and necessary expenses in the performance of their duties. Any
legislative members of the advisory council shall receive the allowances provided for in
Code Section 28-1-8. Citizen members shall receive a daily expense allowance in the
amount specified in subsection (b) of Code Section 45-7-21, as well as the mileage or
transportation allowance authorized for state employees. Members who are state officials
or state employees shall receive no compensation for their services on the advisory council,
but shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as
S. B. 312
- 2 -

LC 62 0138
members of the advisory council in the same manner as reimbursements are made in their
capacity as state officials or state employees. The funds necessary for the reimbursement
of the expenses of state officials, other than legislative members, and state employees shall
come from funds appropriated to or otherwise available to their respective departments.
50-7-131.
(a) The purpose of the advisory council shall be to advise the General Assembly and other
state agencies and departments on establishing the Georgia Peach Walk of Fame and
recommend individuals to be added to the Georgia Peach Walk of Fame.
(b) The advisory council shall conduct the following activities to establish the Georgia
Peach Walk of Fame:
(1) Convene public hearings, make inquiries, and solicit comments from the general
public in Georgia to assist the advisory council with establishing the Georgia Peach Walk
of Fame;
(2) Consult with experts in the industries provided in subsection (c) of this Code section
to establish an initial list of individuals to place in the Georgia Peach Walk of Fame and
make any recommendations that may arise from such consultations to the General
Assembly;
(3) Consult with the General Assembly and other state agencies and departments to
determine the location of the Georgia Peach Walk of Fame;
(4) Advise the department with respect to findings from any public hearings, comments,
and consultations with industry experts and consultations with the General Assembly and
other state agencies and departments;
(5) Make recommendations to the department for individuals to place in the Georgia
Peach Walk of Fame, for locations for the Georgia Peach Walk of Fame, and for selection
procedures to add individuals to the Georgia Peach Walk of Fame; and
(6) Publish on the advisory council's website:
S. B. 312
- 3 -

LC 62 0138
(A) A list of recommended individuals for inclusion on the Georgia Peach Walk of
Fame and a list of individuals already included in the Georgia Peach Walk of Fame,
along with such individuals' accomplishments;
(B) The criteria for inclusion to the list of individuals recommended for inclusion as
provided in subparagraph (b)(6)(A) and the procedure for recommending such
individuals to be added to the Georgia Peach Walk of Fame; and
(C) Times and dates of public hearings of the advisory council and any other
opportunities for comment as required by subsection (e) of Code Section 50-7-130.
(c) Individuals shall be recommended for inclusion on the Georgia Peach Walk of Fame
from the following industries:
(1) Motion pictures;
(2) Television;
(3) Radio;
(4) Recording;
(5) Live theater and performance; and
(6) Sports entertainment.
(d) The advisory council may solicit and accept donations, gifts, grants, property, or
matching funds from any public or private source for the use by the council in conducting
the activities required pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section.
50-7-132.
(a) No later than June 30, 2026, and annually thereafter, the advisory council shall submit
a report to the Governor and the General Assembly. Such annual report shall:
(1) Detail the activities and progress of the advisory council in the prior year;
(2) Provide an update on the status of funding of the advisory council, including any
grant funds which were solicited, accepted, or used, and any remaining balances; and
S. B. 312
- 4 -

LC 62 0138
(3) Provide recommendations to the Governor and General Assembly on individuals to
add to the Georgia Peach Walk of Fame.
(b) Prior to submission, a draft of the annual report shall be made available for public
comment and discussion at an open meeting."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 312
- 5 -